Georgia, session 2025_26, HB272.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Chapter 1 of Title 48 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to general
provisions regarding revenue and taxation, is amended in Code Section 48-1-2, relating to
definitions, by revising paragraph (1) as follows:
"(1) 'Agency' means any department, commission, institution, office, or officer of this
state."
SECTION 2.
This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law
without such approval.
H. B. 272
- 1 -

LC 50 1016
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 272
- 2 -